Colorado, session 2025B, HB25B-1012.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Improving transparency and integrity in prescription drug
purchasing protects employers and health benefit plan sponsors, supports
patient safety, and reduces unnecessary costs, while preserving clinical
decision-making; and
(b) It is the policy of this state to permit pharmacy stewardship
programs and alternative prescription drug sourcing programs
implemented in compliance with federal law in order to reduce net plan
costs without disrupting patient care.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 10-16-171 as
follows:
-2- HB25B-1012

10-16-171. Pharmacy benefit managers - health-care
consultants - prescription drug sourcing - disclosure requirements -
enforcement - short title - definitions. (1) Short title. THE SHORT TITLE
OF THIS SECTION IS THE "PRESCRIPTION DRUG SOURCING TRANSPARENCY
AND INTEGRITY ACT".
(2) Definitions. AS USED IN THIS SECTION:
(a) (I) "ALTERNATIVE PRESCRIPTION DRUG SOURCING PROGRAM"
MEANS A LAWFUL ARRANGEMENT OPERATED BY OR ON BEHALF OF A
SELF-FUNDED EMPLOYER OR HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN SPONSOR UNDER
WHICH A DEFINED SUBSET OF PRESCRIPTION DRUGS FOR COVERED PERSONS
MAY BE DISPENSED THROUGH CHANNELS OTHER THAN THE PLAN'S
PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGER OR CARRIER-ADMINISTERED NETWORK, IF
AUTHORIZED BY FEDERAL LAW, TO REDUCE THE NET PLAN COST WHILE
MAINTAINING PATIENT SAFETY, CONTINUITY OF THERAPY, AND EQUAL OR
LOWER MEMBER COST SHARE. AN ALTERNATIVE PRESCRIPTION DRUG
SOURCING PROGRAM IS NOT INSURANCE, AND PRESCRIPTIONS NOT
FULFILLED THROUGH THE PROGRAM CONTINUE TO PROCESS UNDER A
PLAN'S EXISTING PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGER, CARRIER, AND NETWORK.
(II) "ALTERNATIVE PRESCRIPTION DRUG SOURCING PROGRAM"
INCLUDES A PROGRAM FOR IMPORTING PRESCRIPTION DRUGS AUTHORIZED
BY FEDERAL LAW OR FDA REGULATION.
(b) "HEALTH-CARE CONSULTANT" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL OR
ENTITY THAT PROVIDES PROFESSIONAL ADVICE, ANALYSIS, OR SERVICES
TO A SELF-FUNDED EMPLOYER OR HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN SPONSOR
REGARDING HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN DESIGN OR ADMINISTRATION,
INCLUDING SERVICES RELATED TO PRESCRIPTION DRUG BENEFITS.
(c) "NATIONAL DRUG CODE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
-3- HB25B-1012

SECTION 10-16-122.9 (2)(f).
(d) (I) "PHARMACY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM" MEANS A PROGRAM
OPERATED BY OR ON BEHALF OF A SELF-FUNDED EMPLOYER OR HEALTH
BENEFIT PLAN SPONSOR TO OPTIMIZE THE FINANCIAL PERFORMANCE OF
THE SELF-FUNDED EMPLOYER'S PHARMACY BENEFIT. ALL PRESCRIPTIONS
NOT FULFILLED THROUGH THE PROGRAM CONTINUE UNDER THE PLAN'S
EXISTING PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGER, CARRIER, AND NETWORK.
ACTIVITIES UNDER A PHARMACY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM MAY INCLUDE:
(A) A CLINICALLY APPROPRIATE GENERIC BIOSIMILAR
SUBSTITUTION;
(B) USE OF FEDERALLY LAWFUL TIER 1 SOURCING PATHWAYS;
(C) USE OF MANUFACTURE AND FOUNDATION PATIENT ASSISTANCE
PROGRAMS, WHERE ELIGIBLE;
(D) SITE-OF-CARE OPTIMIZATION WHEN CLINICALLY APPROPRIATE;
AND
(E) FULFILLMENT OF A DEFINED SUBSET OF PRESCRIPTIONS
THROUGH LAWFUL CHANNELS THAT REDUCE NET PLAN COST WHILE
MAINTAINING SAFETY, CONTINUITY OF THERAPY, AND EQUAL OR LOWER
MEMBER COST SHARE.
(II) A "PHARMACY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM" IS NOT:
(A) INSURANCE OR A POLICY OF INSURANCE;
(B) A HEALTH PLAN;
(C) A PBM; OR
(D) A THIRD-PARTY ADMINISTRATOR.
(e) "SELF-FUNDED EMPLOYER" MEANS AN EMPLOYER THAT OFFERS
A SELF-INSURED HEALTH PLAN TO THEIR EMPLOYEES.
(3) Prohibition against misinformation. A PHARMACY BENEFIT
-4- HB25B-1012

MANAGER OR HEALTH-CARE CONSULTANT SHALL NOT KNOWINGLY MAKE
OR DISSEMINATE FALSE OR MISLEADING STATEMENTS OR CLAIMS TO AN
EMPLOYER, HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN SPONSOR, OR POLICYHOLDER ABOUT
THE LEGALITY OR SAFETY OF A LAWFUL ALTERNATIVE PRESCRIPTION DRUG
SOURCING PROGRAM.
(4) Disclosure requirements. UPON WRITTEN REQUEST BY A
SELF-FUNDED EMPLOYER OR HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN SPONSOR, A
PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGER OR HEALTH-CARE CONSULTANT SHALL
PROVIDE DETAILED COST INFORMATION FOR EACH PRESCRIPTION DRUG
DISPENSED UNDER THE PLAN, INCLUDING:
(a) TOTAL DRUG COST PER CLAIM;
(b) TOTAL INGREDIENT COST PER CLAIM;
(c) TOTAL DISPENSING FEE PER CLAIM;
(d) TOTAL MEMBER-PAID PORTION PER CLAIM;
(e) TOTAL PLAN- OR EMPLOYER-PAID PORTION PER CLAIM; AND
(f) NATIONAL DRUG CODE, QUANTITY, STRENGTH, AND DAYS OF
SUPPLY.
(5) Self-funded employer and health benefit plan sponsor
rights. THIS SECTION DOES NOT RESTRICT OR LIMIT THE RIGHT OF A
SELF-FUNDED EMPLOYER OR HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN SPONSOR TO PURCHASE
PRESCRIPTION DRUGS THROUGH ANOTHER LAWFUL ALTERNATIVE
PRESCRIPTION DRUG SOURCING PROGRAM. A SELF-FUNDED EMPLOYER AND
HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN SPONSOR RETAIN THE RIGHT TO CONTRACT FOR ANY
LEGAL ALTERNATIVE PRESCRIPTION DRUG SOURCING PROGRAM,
INCLUDING IMPORTATION PROGRAMS PERMITTED UNDER FEDERAL LAW,
FOR DRUGS USED BY THEIR HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN'S COVERED PERSONS.
(6) (a) Pharmacy stewardship programs. A PHARMACY
-5- HB25B-1012

STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM THAT IS DESIGNED TO IMPROVE THE
COST-EFFECTIVENESS OF MEDICATION USE WHILE MAINTAINING PATIENT
SAFETY IS RECOGNIZED AS AN EFFECTIVE COST-CONTAINMENT TOOL.
(b) PHARMACY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAMS AND ALTERNATIVE
PRESCRIPTION DRUG SOURCING PROGRAMS ARE AUTHORIZED BY STATE
LAW WHEN IMPLEMENTED IN COMPLIANCE WITH FEDERAL LAW AND WITH
THIS SECTION. SUCH AUTHORIZED PROGRAMS INCLUDE PROGRAMS FOR
IMPORTING PRESCRIPTION DRUGS WHEN AUTHORIZED UNDER FEDERAL
LAW.
(c) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO CREATE A
NEW INSURANCE PRODUCT OR MANDATORY COVERAGE.
(7) No state cost or self-funded employer or health benefit
plan sponsor mandate. (a) THIS SECTION DOES NOT:
(I) CREATE A FISCAL REQUIREMENT FOR ANY STATE AGENCY OR AN
APPROPRIATION FROM THE GENERAL FUND;
(II) REQUIRE A SELF-FUNDED EMPLOYER OR HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN
SPONSOR TO ADOPT OR PARTICIPATE IN AN ALTERNATIVE PRESCRIPTION
DRUG SOURCING PROGRAM OR PHARMACY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM; OR
(III) REQUIRE THAT RESOURCES BE EXPENDED AS A RESULT OF THIS
SECTION.
(b) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL IMPLEMENT AND ENFORCE THIS
SECTION WITHIN EXISTING APPROPRIATIONS.
(8) Enforcement. (a) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ENFORCE THIS
SECTION WITH RESPECT TO A PBM OR HEALTH-CARE CONSULTANT THAT
ADMINISTERS OR MANAGES PRESCRIPTION DRUG BENEFITS FOR A HEALTH
BENEFIT PLAN. A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION BY A PBM OR A
HEALTH-CARE CONSULTANT IS AN UNFAIR METHOD OF COMPETITION AND
-6- HB25B-1012

UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE ACT OR PRACTICE IN THE BUSINESS OF INSURANCE
PURSUANT TO SECTION 10-3-1104 (1)(uu). EACH DAY DURING WHICH A
VIOLATION CONTINUES CONSTITUTES A SEPARATE VIOLATION. IN ADDITION
TO THE PENALTIES APPLICABLE TO AN UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE ACT OR
PRACTICE IN THE BUSINESS OF INSURANCE PURSUANT TO SECTION
10-3-1104 (1)(uu), THE COMMISSIONER MAY:
(I) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, ISSUE A PUBLIC LETTER OF
ADMONITION;
(II) FOR A SECOND VIOLATION, IMPOSE A PENALTY OF UP TO ONE
THOUSAND DOLLARS;
(III) FOR A THIRD VIOLATION, IMPOSE A PENALTY OF UP TO TWO
THOUSAND DOLLARS; AND
(IV) FOR A FOURTH OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION:
(A) FOR A PBM, REVOKE THE PBM'S REGISTRATION PURSUANT TO
SECTION 10-16-122.1; OR
(B) REFER THE MATTER TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL TO
COMMENCE A CIVIL ACTION FOR INJUNCTIVE RELIEF, DAMAGES, OR OTHER
REMEDIES AVAILABLE AT LAW, INCLUDING RECOVERY OF COSTS AND
ATTORNEY FEES.
(b) PENALTIES COLLECTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (8)(a)(II),
(8)(a)(III), OR (8)(a)(IV) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE
HEALTH INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION
10-16-1206 (1) TO HELP:
(I) FACILITATE A REDUCTION IN PREMIUM INCREASES ASSOCIATED
WITH THE HEALTH INSURANCE AFFORDABILITY ENTERPRISE CREATED IN
SECTION 10-16-1204 (1)(a); AND
(II) AVOID HEALTH INSURANCE COVERAGE LOSS FOR THOSE IN THE
-7- HB25B-1012

INDIVIDUAL MARKET AND THOSE UNABLE TO PURCHASE HEALTH
INSURANCE THROUGH THE HEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGE CREATED IN
SECTION 10-22-104.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-3-1104, add
(1)(uu) as follows:
10-3-1104. Unfair methods of competition - unfair or deceptive
practices - rules - definitions. (1) The following are defined as unfair
methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the
business of insurance:
(uu) VIOLATING SECTION 10-16-171.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-1206, amend
(1)(g) and (1)(h); and add (1)(i) as follows:
10-16-1206. Health insurance affordability cash fund -
creation. (1) There is created in the state treasury the health insurance
affordability cash fund. The fund consists of:
(g) The federal share of the medical assistance payments received
pursuant to section 25.5-4-503 (2); and
(h) Gifts, grants, or donations received from private or public
sources; AND
(i) MONEY CREDITED TO THE FUND PURSUANT TO SECTION
10-16-171 (8)(b).
SECTION 5. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly; except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant
to section 1 (3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an
item, section, or part of this act within such period, then the act, item,
-8- HB25B-1012

section, or part will not take effect unless approved by the people at the
general election to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take
effect on the date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the
governor.
(2) This act applies to conduct or omissions occurring on or after
the applicable effective date of this act.
-9- HB25B-1012